Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 3. Certificates and Permits

§ 31-18-209.
Issuance of authority; matters to be considered; deposit of insurance.

The department shall issue authority to qualified motor carriers. The authority shall remain valid and in effect unless revoked or suspended by the department for good cause, such as a violation of this act, or cancelled at the request of the authority holder.

The replacement fee for a letter of authority shall be ten dollars ($10.00). Applications for authority shall be made in writing and verified and shall contain the following information:

The name and address of applicant;

A statement of the nature of transportation service proposed;

through (viii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Appropriate additional information as the department deems necessary; and

A filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 3.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

As the department grants authority it shall assign each motor carrier a docket number and shall notify the appropriate divisions within the department.

The department shall require intrastate contract carriers to deposit with it, policies of insurance companies which are either authorized to do business in Wyoming or are lawfully able to transact insurance without a certificate of authority pursuant to title 26 of the Wyoming statutes as determined by the insurance commissioner of this state or other adequate security for cargo, public liability and property damage insurance for the protection of the public generally. The policy of insurance, bond or proof of other security shall be continuous and remain in full force and effect unless and until cancelled on not less than thirty (30) days written notice to the department, the notice to commence to run from the date it is received at the office of the department. The cancellation filed with the department shall, upon its effective date, suspend the operating authority of the affected carrier and no operations shall be conducted on any highway until the insurance, bond or other adequate security, in the form and amount required, becomes effective and is approved by the department. The department shall require contract motor carriers to use and carry in their motor vehicles at all times uniform bills of lading, showing all property currently being transported, to deliver copies to both consignor and consignee and to retain a copy for the inspection of the department and the state highway patrol.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-201

; Laws 1987, ch. 150, § 1; 1990, ch. 6, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 4; ch. 98, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 215, §§ 1, 3; 2020 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to certificate of convenience and necessity, see §

37-2-205

.

The 2007 amendment,

by ch. 215, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (b) inserted the first sentence; by ch. 215, § 3, repealed former (b)(xi), which read: “The replacement fee for a letter of authority shall be ten dollars ($10.00).”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added “or suspended” in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

37-8-201

, effective July 1, 1993.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-18-101(a)(xix).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

“Necessity for service.” —

“Necessity for motor transportation service,” within the meaning of this section, referred to a definite need of general public for transportation service, where no reasonably adequate service existed; not the need of motor carriers for business. Application of Calhoun, 51 Wyo. 448, 68 P.2d 591,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1937) (decided under prior law).

Enlargement of service. —

Transfer of certificates of public convenience and necessity cannot be made so as to unite them in one holder and thereby enlarge service theretofore rendered, or territory theretofore served by either or both of them, without a finding by the commission that public convenience and necessity requires such enlargement of service. Application of Calhoun, 51 Wyo. 448, 68 P.2d 591,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1937).

Transfer of certificates. —

Transfer of two or more certificates of public convenience and necessity, for local service, cannot be made so as to unite them in one holder, thereby creating a through service, without finding by commission that public convenience and necessity needs such through service. Application of Calhoun, 51 Wyo. 448, 68 P.2d 591,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1937).

Right to transfer. —

Carriers holding certificates of public convenience and necessity to motor carriers have no absolute right to transfer certificates to permit consolidation of services between connecting points, but are only entitled to effect such transfer on showing of public convenience and necessity in proceeding before public service commission. Application of Calhoun, 51 Wyo. 448, 68 P.2d 591,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1937).

Applied

in

In re Union Pac. Motor Freight Co., 72 Wyo. 298, 264 P.2d 771,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(1953).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Carrier's certificate of convenience and necessity, franchise, or permit as subject to transfer or encumbrance, 15 ALR2d 883.

Liability of freight motor carrier possessing certificate from Interstate Commerce Commission and employing noncertified independent contractor under “one-way” lease of latter's vehicle for negligence of latter's employee on return trip, 16 ALR2d 960.

Power of municipal corporation to limit exclusive use of designated lanes or streets to busses and taxicabs, 43 ALR3d 1374.

Effect of Motor Carrier Act Provisions on insurance and indemnity agreements (49 U.S.C. §§ 13906, 14102) in allocating losses involving interstate motor carriers, 157 ALR Fed 549.

§§ 31-18-210 through 31-18-213.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related to certificates and permits of common carriers.